Wisconsin, session 2025, SB483.
do enact as follows:SB483,13Section 1. 74.09 (3) (gb) of the statutes is created to read:SB483,2,3474.09 (3) (gb) 1. Include from the school district where the property is located 5information regarding the amount of any gross reduction in state aid to the district 1under ss. 115.7915 (4m), 118.60 (4d), and 121.08 (4) (b) in the previous year and the 2current year and the percentage change between those years, except that this 3paragraph does not apply in any year in which such a reduction does not occur.SB483,2,542. In addition to the information provided under subd. 1., include the 5following insert in substantially similar form:SB483,2,106“The gross reduction in state aid to your school district in .... (current year) is 7$ .... as a result of pupils enrolled in the .... (statewide choice program) (Racine 8choice program) (Milwaukee choice program) or as a result of payments to .... (a 9private school) under the special needs scholarship program. Your school district 10had the option to increase property taxes to replace this aid reduction.”SB483,2,1111